Utah statutes.
20A-5-407.   Election officer to provide ballot boxes.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), each election officer shall:

(a)  provide one ballot box with a lock and key for each polling place; and

(b)  deliver the ballot boxes, locks, and keys to the polling place or the election judges of each voting precinct no later than noon on the day before the election.

(2)  Election officers for municipalities and local districts may obtain ballot boxes from the county clerk's office.

(3)  If locks and keys are unavailable, the ballot box lid shall be secured by tape.



Amended by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

